Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-251
Town clerk; duties; proceedings to raise money; certificate to county clerk.

The town clerk shall, within ten days after any township meeting at which any action was had for raising money, deliver to the county clerk a certified copy or copies of all entries of votes for the raising of such money, and it shall be the duty of the county clerk to lay all such matters before the county board at their next meeting.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 49, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 1035;

C.S.1922, § 937;

C.S.1929, § 26-251;

R.S.1943, § 23-251.

Although each township has a township board and township officers, each of which has statutorily prescribed powers and duties, the powers of the township are exercised through direct local self-government. Butler County Dairy v. Butler County, 285 Neb. 408, 827 N.W.2d 267 (2013).